California, session 20252026, AB1267.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 297 of the Family Code is amended to read:297. (a) Domestic partners are two adults who have chosen to share one another’s lives in an intimate and committed relationship of mutual caring.(b) A domestic partnership shall be established in California when both persons file a Declaration of Domestic Partnership with the Secretary of State pursuant to this division, and, at the time of filing, all of the following requirements are met:(1) Neither person is married to another person, or is a member of another domestic partnership with another person, that has not been terminated, dissolved, or adjudged a nullity.(2) The two persons are not related by blood in a way that would prevent them from being married to each other in this state.(3) Both persons are at least 18 years of age.(4) Both persons are capable of consenting to the domestic partnership.SEC. 2. Section 297.1 of the Family Code is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 298.8 of the Family Code is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 302 of the Family Code is repealed.SEC. 5. Section 303 of the Family Code is repealed.SEC. 6. Section 304 of the Family Code is repealed.SEC. 7. Section 423 of the Family Code is amended to read:423. The person solemnizing the marriage shall return the marriage license, endorsed as required in Section 422, to the county recorder of the county in which the license was issued within 10 days after the ceremony.SEC. 8. Section 1501 of the Family Code is repealed.SEC. 9. Section 2210 of the Family Code is amended to read:2210. A marriage is void voidable and may be adjudged a nullity if any of the following conditions existed at the time of the marriage:(a) The party who commences the proceeding or on whose behalf the proceeding is commenced was under 18 years of age, unless the party entered into the marriage pursuant to former Section 302 or former Section 303 in this state before January 1, 2027.(b) The spouse of either party was living, and the marriage with that spouse was then in force and that spouse (1) was absent and not known to the party commencing the proceeding to be living for a period of five successive years immediately preceding the subsequent marriage for which the judgment of nullity is sought or (2) was generally reputed or believed by the party commencing the proceeding to be dead at the time the subsequent marriage was contracted.(c) Either party was of unsound mind, unless the party of unsound mind, after coming to reason, freely cohabited with the other as their spouse.(d) The consent of either party was obtained by fraud, unless the party whose consent was obtained by fraud afterwards, with full knowledge of the facts constituting the fraud, freely cohabited with the other as their spouse.(e) The consent of either party was obtained by force, unless the party whose consent was obtained by force afterwards freely cohabited with the other as their spouse.(f) Either party was, at the time of marriage, physically incapable of entering into the marriage state, and that incapacity continues and appears to be incurable.SEC. 10. Section 102233 of the Health and Safety Code is repealed.SEC. 11. Section 102356 of the Health and Safety Code is repealed.